Utah, session 2026, SB12.
Section 1. Section 4-17-104 is amended to read:4-17-104Effective 05/06/26Repealed 07/01/26. Creation of State Weed Committee -- Membership -- Powers and duties -- Expenses.(1)There is created a State Weed Committee composed of eight members, with each member representing one of the following:(a)the Department of Agriculture and Food created in Section 4-2-102;(b)the Department of Natural Resources created in Section 79-2-201;(c)the Utah State University Agricultural Experiment Station;(d)the Utah State University Extension Service;(e)the Utah Association of Counties;(f)private agricultural industry;(g)the Utah Weed Control Association; and(h)the Utah Weed Supervisors Association.(2)The commissioner shall select the members of the committee from those nominated by each of the respective groups or agencies described in Subsection (1) following approval by the executive committee of the Agricultural Advisory Board.(3)(a)Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current committee members expire, the commissioner shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.(b)Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the commissioner shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.(4)(a)Members may be removed by the commissioner for cause.(b)When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.(5)The State Weed Committee shall:(a)confer and advise on matters pertaining to the planning, implementation, and administration of the state noxious weed program;(b)recommend namesnominees to the commissioner for membership on the committee; and(c)serve as members of the executive committee of the Utah Weed Control Association.(6)A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:(a)Section 63A-3-106;(b)Section 63A-3-107; and(c)rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant tounder Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-1-204 is amended to read:63I-1-204Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 4.(1)Section 4-2-108, Agricultural Advisory Board created -- Composition -- Responsibility -- Terms of office -- Compensation -- Executive committee, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Section 4-17-104, Creation of State Weed Committee -- Membership -- Powers and duties -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(3)Title 4, Chapter 18, Part 3, Utah Soil Health Program, is repealed July 1, 2026.(4)Section 4-20-103, Utah Grazing Improvement Program Advisory Board -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2032.(5)Section 4-23-104, Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Board created -- Composition -- Appointment -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Compensation, is repealed July 1, 2034.(6)Section 4-23-105, Board responsibilities -- Damage prevention policy -- Rules -- Methods to control predators and depredating birds and animals, is repealed July 1, 2034.(7)Section 4-24-104, Livestock Brand Board created -- Composition -- Terms -- Removal -- Quorum for transaction of business -- Compensation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2035.(8)Section 4-39-104, Domesticated Elk Act advisory council, is repealed July 1, 2027.(9)Title 4, Chapter 46, Part 2, Land Conservation Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(10)Subsection 4-46-304(2)(d), regarding the Land Conservation Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)Subsection 4-46-401(3)(a), regarding the Land Conservation Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 63I-1-209 is amended to read:63I-1-209Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 9.(1)Subsection 9-1-208(5), regarding the One Utah Service Fellowship Program, is repealed July 1, 2027.(2)Section 9-6-301, Utah Arts and Museums Advisory Board, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)Section 9-6-302, Arts and museums board powers and duties, is repealed July 1, 2029.(4)Subsection 9-8a-101(2), regarding the National Register Review Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Section 9-8a-204, National Register Review Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(6)Section 9-9-112, Bears Ears Visitor Center Advisory Committee, is repealed December 31, 20262028.(7)Section 9-9-405, Review committee, is repealed July 1, 2030.(8)Title 9, Chapter 20, Utah Commission on Service and Volunteerism Act, is repealed July 1, 2027.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 63I-1-213 is amended to read:63I-1-213Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 13.(1)Title 13, Chapter 1b, Office of Professional Licensure Review, is repealed July 1, 2034.(2)Section 13-43-202, Land Use and Eminent Domain Advisory Board -- Appointment -- Compensation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(3)Title 13, Chapter 79, Office of the Homeowners' Association Ombudsman, is repealed July 1, 2030.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 63I-1-219 is amended to read:63I-1-219Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 19.(1)Title 19, Chapter 2, Air Conservation Act, is repealed July 1, 2029.(2)Section 19-2-109.6, Plantwide applicability limitation -- Publication of guidance required -- Report to committee -- Rulemaking, is repealed July 1, 2026.(3)Section 19-2-109.7, Permit by rule registration expansion study, is repealed July 1, 2026.(4)Title 19, Chapter 4, Safe Drinking Water Act, is repealed July 1, 2029.(5)Section 19-4-115, Drinking water quality in schools and child care centers, is repealed July 1, 2027.(6)Title 19, Chapter 5, Water Quality Act, is repealed July 1, 2029.(7)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 1, Solid and Hazardous Waste Act, is repealed July 1, 2029.(8)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 3, Hazardous Substances Mitigation Act, is repealed July 1, 2030.(9)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 4, Petroleum Storage Tank Act, is repealed July 1, 2028.(10)Section 19-6-510, Study of glass recycling, is repealed July 1, 2026.(11)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 6, Lead Acid Battery Disposal, is repealed July 1, 2026.(12)(11)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 7, Used Oil Management Act, is repealed July 1, 2029.(13)(12)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 8, Waste Tire Recycling Act, is repealed July 1, 2030.(14)(13)Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 10, Mercury Switch Removal Act, is repealed July 1, 2027.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 63I-1-226 is amended to read:63I-1-226Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Titles 26 through 26B.(1)Subsection 26B-1-204(2)(g), regarding the Youth Electronic Cigarette, Marijuana, and Other Drug Prevention Committee, is repealed July 1, 2030.(2)Subsection 26B-1-204(2)(h), regarding the Primary Care Grant Committee, is repealed July 1, 2035.(3)Section 26B-1-315, Medicaid ACA Fund, is repealed July 1, 2034.(4)Section 26B-1-318, Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Fund, is repealed July 1, 2029.(5)Section 26B-1-402, Rare Disease Advisory Council Grant Program -- Creation -- Reporting, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(6)Section 26B-1-409, Utah Digital Health Service Commission -- Creation -- Membership -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2025.(7)Section 26B-1-410, Primary Care Grant Committee, is repealed July 1, 2035.(8)Section 26B-1-417, Brain and Spinal Cord Injury Advisory Committee -- Membership -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2029.(9)Section 26B-1-422, Early Childhood Utah Advisory Council -- Creation -- Compensation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2029.(10)Section 26B-1-425, Utah Health Workforce Advisory Council -- Creation and membership, is repealed July 1, 2027.(11)Section 26B-1-428, Youth Electronic Cigarette, Marijuana, and Other Drug Prevention Committee and Program -- Creation -- Membership -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 2030.(12)Section 26B-1-430, Coordinating Council for Persons with Disabilities -- Policy regarding services to individuals with disabilities -- Creation -- Membership -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2027.(13)Section 26B-1-432, Newborn Hearing Screening Committee, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(14)Section 26B-2-407, Drinking water quality in child care centers, is repealed July 1, 2027.(15)Subsection 26B-3-107(9), regarding reimbursement for dental hygienists, is repealed July 1, 2028.(16)Section 26B-3-136, Children's Health Care Coverage Program, is repealed July 1, 2025.(17)Section 26B-3-137, Reimbursement for diabetes prevention program, is repealed June 30, 2027.(18)Subsection 26B-3-213(2)(b), regarding consultation with the Behavioral Health Crisis Response Committee, is repealed December 31, 2026.(19)Section 26B-3-302, DUR Board -- Creation and membership -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2027.(20)Section 26B-3-303, DUR Board -- Responsibilities, is repealed July 1, 2027.(21)Section 26B-3-304, Confidentiality of records, is repealed July 1, 2027.(22)Section 26B-3-305, Drug prior approval program, is repealed July 1, 2027.(23)Section 26B-3-306, Advisory committees, is repealed July 1, 2027.(24)Section 26B-3-307, Retrospective and prospective DUR, is repealed July 1, 2027.(25)Section 26B-3-308, Penalties, is repealed July 1, 2027.(26)Section 26B-3-309, Immunity, is repealed July 1, 2027.(27)Title 26B, Chapter 3, Part 5, Inpatient Hospital Assessment, is repealed July 1, 2034.(28)Title 26B, Chapter 3, Part 6, Medicaid Expansion Hospital Assessment, is repealed July 1, 2034.(29)Title 26B, Chapter 3, Part 7, Hospital Provider Assessment, is repealed July 1, 2028.(30)Section 26B-3-910, Alternative eligibility -- Report -- Alternative Eligibility Expendable Revenue Fund, is repealed July 1, 2028.(31)Section 26B-4-710, Rural residency training program, is repealed July 1, 2025.(32)Subsection 26B-5-112(1)(b), regarding consultation with the Behavioral Health Crisis Response Committee, is repealed December 31, 2026.(33)Subsection 26B-5-112(5)(b), regarding consultation with the Behavioral Health Crisis Response Committee, is repealed December 31, 2026July 1, 2029.(34)Section 26B-5-112.5, Mobile Crisis Outreach Team Grant Program, is repealed December 31, 2026July 1, 2029.(35)Section 26B-5-114, Behavioral Health Receiving Center Grant Program, is repealed December 31, 2026July 1, 2029.(36)Section 26B-5-118, Collaborative care grant program, is repealed December 31, 2024.(37)Section 26B-5-120, Virtual crisis outreach team grant program, is repealed December 31, 2026.(38)Subsection 26B-5-609(1)(a), regarding the Behavioral Health Crisis Response Committee, is repealed December 31, 2026July 1, 2029.(39)Subsection 26B-5-609(3)(b), regarding the Behavioral Health Crisis Response Committee, is repealed December 31, 2026July 1, 2029.(40)Subsection 26B-5-610(1)(b), regarding the Behavioral Health Crisis Response Committee, is repealed December 31, 2026July 1, 2029.(41)Subsection 26B-5-610(2)(b)(ii), regarding the Behavioral Health Crisis Response Committee, is repealed December 31, 2026July 1, 2029.(42)Section 26B-5-612, Integrated behavioral health care grant programs, is repealed December 31, 2025.(43)Title 26B, Chapter 5, Part 7, Utah Behavioral Health Commission, is repealed July 1, 2029.(44)Subsection 26B-5-704(2)(a), regarding the Behavioral Health Crisis Response Committee, is repealed December 31, 2026July 1, 2029.(45)Title 26B, Chapter 5, Part 8, Utah Substance Use and Mental Health Advisory Committee, is repealed January 1, 2033.(46)Section 26B-7-119, Hepatitis C Outreach Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(47)Section 26B-7-122, Communication Habits to reduce Adolescent Threats Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2029.(48)Section 26B-7-123, Report on CHAT campaign, is repealed July 1, 2029.(49)Title 26B, Chapter 8, Part 5, Utah Health Data Authority, is repealed July 1, 2026.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 63I-1-235 is amended to read:63I-1-235Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 35A.(1)Subsection 35A-1-202(2)(d), regarding the Child Care Advisory Committee, is repealed July 1, 20262029.(2)Section 35A-3-205, Creation of committee, is repealed July 1, 2026.(3)Subsection 35A-4-502(5), regarding the Employment Advisory Council, is repealed July 1, 2029.(4)Title 35A, Chapter 9, Part 6, Education Savings Incentive Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(5)Section 35A-13-303, State Rehabilitation Advisory Council, is repealed July 1, 2034.(6)Section 35A-16-206, Utah Homeless Network Steering Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(7)Section 35A-16-207, Duties of the steering committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(8)Section 35A-16-212, Property Loss Related to Homelessness Compensation Enterprise Fund, is repealed July 1, 2028.(9)Title 35A, Chapter 16, Part 10, Homeless Services Provider Ombudsman, is repealed July 1, 2030.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 63I-1-258 is amended to read:63I-1-258Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 58.(1)Title 58, Chapter 13, Health Care Providers Immunity from Liability Act, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(2)Title 58, Chapter 15, Health Facility Administrator Act, is repealed July 1, 2035.(3)Title 58, Chapter 20b, Environmental Health Scientist Act, is repealed July 1, 2028.(4)Section 58-37-3.5, Drugs for behavioral health treatment, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Subsection 58-37-6(7)(f)(iii), regarding a seven-day opiate supply restriction, is repealed July 1, 2032.(6)Title 58, Chapter 40, Recreational Therapy Practice Act, is repealed July 1, 2033.(7)Title 58, Chapter 41, Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology Licensing Act, is repealed July 1, 20292036.(8)Title 58, Chapter 46a, Hearing Instrument Specialist Licensing Act, is repealed July 1, 20332036.(9)Title 58, Chapter 47b, Massage Therapy Practice Act, is repealed July 1, 2034.(10)Subsection 58-47b-102(8), defining massage assistant, is repealed July 1, 2029.(11)Subsection 58-47b-102(9), defining massage assistant-in-training, is repealed July 1, 2029.(12)Subsection 58-47b-302(1), regarding applicant for a massage assistant-in-training, is repealed July 1, 2029.(13)Subsection 58-47b-302(2), regarding applicant for a massage assistant, is repealed July 1, 2029.(14)Subsection 58-47b-303(3)(b), regarding expiration of a massage assistant-in-training license, is repealed July 1, 2029.(15)Subsection 58-55-201(2), regarding the Alarm System and Security Licensing Advisory Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(16)Title 58, Chapter 61, Part 7, Behavior Analyst Licensing Act, is repealed July 1, 20262036.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 63I-1-263 is amended to read:63I-1-263Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Titles 63A to 63O.(1)Title 63C, Chapter 4a, Constitutional and Federalism Defense Act, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Title 63C, Chapter 18, Behavioral Health Crisis Response Committee, is repealed December 31, 2026July 1, 2029.(3)Title 63C, Chapter 25, State Finance Review Commission, is repealed July 1, 2027.(4)Title 63C, Chapter 27, Cybersecurity Commission, is repealed July 1, 2032.(5)Title 63C, Chapter 28, Ethnic Studies Commission, is repealed July 1, 2026.(6)Title 63C, Chapter 31, State Employee Benefits Advisory Commission, is repealed July 1, 2028.(7)Section 63G-6a-805, Purchase from community rehabilitation programs, is repealed July 1, 2026.(8)Title 63G, Chapter 21, Agreements to Provide State Services, is repealed July 1, 2028.(9)Title 63H, Chapter 4, Heber Valley Historic Railroad Authority, is repealed July 1, 2029.(10)Subsection 63J-1-602.2(16), related to the Communication Habits to reduce Adolescent Threats (CHAT) Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2029.(11)Subsection 63J-1-602.2(26), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(12)Section 63L-11-204, Canyon resource management plan, is repealed July 1, 2027.(13)Title 63L, Chapter 11, Part 4, Resource Development Coordinating Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(14)Title 63M, Chapter 7, Part 7, Domestic Violence Offender Treatment Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(15)Section 63M-7-902, Creation -- Membership -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(16)Title 63M, Chapter 11, Utah Commission on Aging, is repealed July 1, 20262031.(17)Title 63N, Chapter 2, Part 2, Enterprise Zone Act, is repealed July 1, 2028.(18)Subsection 63N-2-511(1)(b), regarding the Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.(19)Section 63N-2-512, Hotel Impact Mitigation Fund, is repealed July 1, 2028.(20)Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 9, Strategic Innovation Grant Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2027.(21)Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 11, Manufacturing Modernization Grant Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(22)Title 63N, Chapter 4, Part 4, Rural Employment Expansion Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(23)Section 63N-4-804, Rural Opportunity Advisory Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(24)Subsection 63N-4-805(5)(b), regarding the Rural Employment Expansion Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(25)Subsection 63N-7-101(1), regarding the Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.(26)Subsection 63N-7-102(3)(c), regarding a requirement for the Utah Office of Tourism to receive approval from the Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.(27)Title 63N, Chapter 7, Part 2, Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 63I-1-278 is amended to read:63I-1-278Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 78A and Title 78B.(1)Subsection 78A-7-106(7), regarding the transfer of a criminal action involving a domestic violence offense from the justice court to the district court, is repealed July 1, 2029.(2)Section 78B-3-421, Arbitration agreements, is repealed July 1, 2029.(3)Section 78B-4-518, Limitation on liability of employer for an employee convicted of an offense, is repealed July 1, 2029.(4)Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 2, Alternative Dispute Resolution Act, is repealed July 1, 20262036. (5)Section 78B-22-805, Interdisciplinary Parental Representation Pilot Program, is repealed December 31, 2026.

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 63I-2-226 is amended to read:63I-2-226Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Titles 26 through 26B.(1)Section 26B-1-420, Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(2)Subsection 26B-1-421(9)(a), regarding a report to the Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(3)Section 26B-1-423, Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program Advisory Committee -- Membership -- Compensation -- Duties, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(4)Section 26B-2-243, Data collection and reporting requirements concerning incidents of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, is repealed July 1, 2027.(5)Subsection 26B-3-215(5), regarding reporting on coverage for in vitro fertilization and genetic testing, is repealed July 1, 2030.(6)Subsection 26B-4-201(5), regarding the Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(7)Subsection 26B-4-212(1)(b), regarding the Cannabis Research Review Board, is repealed July 1, 2025.(8)Section 26B-4-702, Creation of Utah Health Care Workforce Financial Assistance Program, is repealed July 1, 2027.(9)Subsection 26B-4-703(3)(b), regarding per diem and expenses for the Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program Advisory Committee, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(10)Subsection 26B-4-703(3)(c), regarding expenses for the Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(11)Subsection 26B-4-703(6)(b), regarding recommendations from the Rural Physician Loan Repayment Program Advisory Committee, is repealed July 1, 20262036.(12)Section 26B-5-117, Early childhood mental health support grant program, is repealed January 2, 2025.(13)Section 26B-5-302.5, Study concerning civil commitment and the Utah State Hospital, is repealed July 1, 2025.(14)Section 26B-6-414, Respite care services, is repealed July 1, 2025.(15)Section 26B-7-120, Invisible condition alert program education and outreach, is repealed  July 1, 2025.

Section 12:
Section 12.  FY 2027 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2027. Subsection 12(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.SOCIAL SERVICESDEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICESITEM 1Department of Health and Human Services - Clinical ServicesFrom General Fund19,000State Laboratory19,000The Legislature intends that the Department of Health and Human Services use the appropriations in this item to fund the Rare Disease Advisory Council described in Section 26B-1-402.

Section 13:
Section 13.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect May 6, 2026.(2)The actions affecting Section 12, FY 2027 Appropriations (Effective 07/01/26) take effect on July 1, 2026.